Washington statutes.
RCW 18.59.080

License issuance—Posting required.

The secretary shall issue a license to a person who meets the licensing requirements of this chapter upon payment of the prescribed license fee. The license shall be posted in a conspicuous location at the person's worksite.

[ 1991 c 3 s 154; 1984 c 9 s 9.]